Mississippi, session 2026, SB2535.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Effective January 1, 2027, all radiation oncology facilities located in the State of Mississippi shall be accredited by the American College of Radiology (ACR) and the American Society for Radiation Oncology (ASTRO) and certified by the Division of Health Facilities Licensure and Certification of the State Department of Health to ensure quality and safety.  This requirement shall be applicable to: (a)  Radiation oncology outpatient units within hospitals; (b)  Independent, freestanding centers focusing specifically on radiation treatment; and (c)  Comprehensive centers which offer radiation oncology with chemotherapy for patient convenience.   (2)  For purposes of this act, "radiation oncology facilities" shall mean specialized medical environments designed for the treatment of cancer and certain benign conditions using high-energy, ionizing radiation such as x-rays or proton beams, designed to destroy tumor cells while minimizing damage to surrounding health tissue. (3)  Any radiation oncology facility which is not in compliance with this act shall not be eligible for Medicaid reimbursement for providing any medical service. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.